Utah statutes.
53A-1a-501.3.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Asset" means property of all kinds, real and personal, tangible and intangible, and includes:

(a)  cash;

(b)  stock or other investments;

(c)  real property;

(d)  equipment and supplies;

(e)  an ownership interest;

(f)  a license;

(g)  a cause of action; and

(h)  any similar property.

(2)  "Board of trustees of a higher education institution" or "board of trustees" means:

(a)  the board of trustees of:

(i)  the University of Utah;

(ii)  Utah State University;

(iii)  Weber State University;

(iv)  Southern Utah University;

(v)  Snow College;

(vi)  Dixie State College of Utah;

(vii)  Utah Valley University; or

(viii)  Salt Lake Community College; or

(b)  the campus board of directors of a college campus within the Utah College of Applied Technology.

(3)  "Chartering entity" means the entity that authorizes the establishment of a charter school.



Amended by Chapter 353, 2010 General Session, (Coordination Clause) 

Amended by Chapter 353, 2010 General Session

